Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.100

Procedure upon application—Inspection of premises.

If the director finds that the locations, buildings, substations equipment, vehicles, places of transfer, or proposed method of operation do not fully comply with the requirements of this chapter, he or she shall notify the applicant by registered letter wherein the same fails to comply. If the applicant whose plant or operation failed to comply notifies the director within ten days from the receipt of the registered letter that he or she will discontinue operations, the fee accompanying the application will be returned to him or her; otherwise no part of the fee will be refunded. If the applicant whose plant failed to comply within a reasonable time, to be fixed by the director or his or her authorized representative, notifies the director that such defects are remedied, a second inspection shall be made. Not more than two inspections may be made on one application.

[ 2011 c 336 s 441; 1949 c 100 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-10.]